Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Chapter 9. Uniform Custodial Trust Act.

§ 64.2-900.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Adult”
means an individual who is at least 18 years of age.

“Beneficiary”
means an individual for whom property has been transferred to or held under a declaration of trust by a custodial trustee for the individual’s use and benefit under this chapter.

“Conservator”
means a person appointed or qualified by a court to manage the estate of an individual or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions.

“Court”
means a circuit court of the Commonwealth.

“Custodial trust property”
means an interest in property transferred to or held under a declaration of trust by a custodial trustee under this chapter and the income from and proceeds of that interest.

“Custodial trustee”
means a person designated as trustee of a custodial trust under this chapter or a substitute or successor to the person designated.

“Guardian”
means a person appointed or qualified by a court as a guardian of a person, including a limited guardian, but not a person who is only a guardian ad litem.

“Incapacitated”
means lacking the ability to manage property and business affairs effectively by reason of mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or disability, chronic use of drugs, chronic intoxication, confinement, detention by a foreign power, disappearance, minority, or other disabling cause.

“Legal representative”
means a personal representative or conservator.

“Member of the beneficiary’s family”
means a beneficiary’s spouse, descendant, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, sister, uncle, or aunt, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption.

“Person”
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, joint venture, association, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Personal representative”
means an executor, administrator, or special administrator of a decedent’s estate, a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions, or a successor to any of them.

“State”
means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

“Transferor”
means a person who creates a custodial trust by transfer or declaration.

“Trust company”
means a financial institution, corporation, or other legal entity authorized to exercise general trust powers.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.1; 2012, c. 614.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alaska: Alaska Stat. §§ 13.60.010 to 13.60.990.

Arizona: A.R.S. §§ 14-9101 to 14-9119.

Colorado: C.R.S. §§ 15-1.5-101 to 15-1.5-122.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code §§ 19-1101 to 19-1120.

Hawaii: H.R.S. §§ 554B-1 to 554B-22.

Idaho: Idaho Code §§ 68-1301 to 68-1322.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann. §§ 30-2-8.6-1 through 30-2-8.6-39.

Louisiana: La. R.S. §§ 9:2260.1 to 9:2260.21.

Massachusetts: Mass. Ann. Laws ch. 203B, §§ 1 to 19.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. §§ 529.01 to 529.19.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. §§ 30-3501 to 30-3522.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 166A.010 to 166A.360.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. §§ 45-7-501 to 45-7-522.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 33B-1 to 33B-22.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws §§ 18-13-1 to 18-13-22.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat. § 54.950 et seq.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-207 Bequest or Devise to Minor, et seq.; No. 15-303 Revocable Inter Vivos Trust Agreement — Another Form Amending Existing Declaration of Trust, et seq.

§ 64.2-901.
Custodial trust; creation and termination; general provisions.

A person may create a custodial trust of property by a written transfer of the property to another person, evidenced by registration if the property is of a type subject to registration, or by other instrument of transfer, executed in any lawful manner, naming as beneficiary an individual who may be the transferor, in which the transferee is designated, in substance, as custodial trustee under this chapter.

In addition, a person may create a custodial trust of property by a written declaration, evidenced by registration of the property if the property is of a type subject to registration, or by other instrument of declaration, executed in any lawful manner, describing the property and naming as beneficiary an individual other than the declarant, in which the declarant as titleholder is designated, in substance, as custodial trustee under this chapter. A registration or other declaration of trust for the sole benefit of the declarant is not a custodial trust under this chapter.

Title to custodial trust property is in the custodial trustee and the beneficial interest is in the beneficiary.

The beneficiary, if not incapacitated, may terminate a custodial trust by delivering to the custodial trustee a writing signed by the beneficiary declaring the termination. The conservator of an incapacitated beneficiary may similarly terminate the custodial trust in this manner but only if granted the power by the circuit court that appointed him in a proceeding in which the custodial trustee is made a party. If not previously terminated, the custodial trust terminates on the death of the beneficiary. A transferor may not terminate a custodial trust except as provided in this subsection.

Any person may augment existing custodial trust property by the addition of other property pursuant to this chapter.

The transferor may designate, or authorize the designation of, a successor custodial trustee in the trust instrument.

This chapter does not displace or restrict other means of creating trusts. A trust whose terms do not conform to this chapter may be enforceable according to its terms under other law.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.2; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-902.
Custodial trustee for future payment or transfer.

A person having the right to designate the recipient of property payable or transferable upon a future event may create a custodial trust upon the occurrence of the future event by designating in writing the recipient, followed in substance by: “as custodial trustee for. . . . . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act.”

Persons may be designated as substitute or successor custodial trustees to whom the property shall be paid or transferred in the order named if the first designated custodial trustee is unable or unwilling to serve.

A designation under this section may be made in a will, a trust, a deed, a multiple-party account, an insurance policy, an instrument exercising a power of appointment, or a writing designating a beneficiary of contractual rights. Otherwise, to be effective, the designation shall be registered with or delivered to the fiduciary, payor, issuer, or obligor of the future right.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.3; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-903.
Form and effect of receipt and acceptance by custodial trustee; jurisdiction.

Obligations of a custodial trustee, including the obligation to follow directions of the beneficiary, arise under this chapter upon the custodial trustee’s acceptance, express or implied, of the custodial trust property.

The custodial trustee’s acceptance may be evidenced by a writing stating in substance:

Click to view

Upon accepting custodial trust property, a person designated as custodial trustee under this chapter is subject to personal jurisdiction of the court with respect to any matter relating to the custodial trust.

CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE’S RECEIPT AND ACCEPTANCE I, . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . (name of custodial trustee), acknowledge receipt of the custodial trust property described below or in the attached instrument and accept the custodial trust as custodial trustee for . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act. I undertake to administer and distribute the custodial trust property pursuant to the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act. My obligations as custodial trustee are subject to the directions of the beneficiary unless the beneficiary is designated as, is, or becomes incapacitated. The custodial trust property consists of Dated: (signature of custodial trustee)

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.4; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-317 Transfer Under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act, et seq.

§ 64.2-904.
Transfer to custodial trustee by fiduciary or obligor; facility of payment.

Unless otherwise directed by an instrument designating a custodial trustee pursuant to §

64.2-902

, a person, including a fiduciary other than a custodial trustee, who holds property of or owes a debt to an incapacitated individual not having a conservator may make a transfer to an adult member of the beneficiary’s family or to a trust company as custodial trustee for the use and benefit of the incapacitated individual. If the value of the property or the debt exceeds $25,000, the transfer is not effective unless authorized by the court.

With court approval, any person, including a conservator, guardian, or other fiduciary who holds property of or owes a debt to an incapacitated individual, may make a transfer to any person as a custodial trustee for the use and benefit of the incapacitated individual. The court, in the exercise of its discretion, may require the custodial trustee to furnish a bond with surety for the faithful performance of his fiduciary duties.

A written acknowledgment of delivery, signed by a custodial trustee, is a sufficient receipt and discharge for property transferred to the custodial trustee pursuant to this section.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.5; 1995, c. 444; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532, in subsection A, substituted “$25,000” for “$10,000.”

Law Review.

For 1995 survey of wills, trusts, and estates, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1175 (1995).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-232 Distribution to Custodial Trustee for Incapacitated Beneficiary; No. 15-317 Transfer Under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act, et seq.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Distribution by fiduciary to custodial trustee does not require court approval. —

Section 55-34.5 does not require a fiduciary exercising administrative power under § 64.1-57(1)(p)(5) to obtain court approval before distributing to a custodial trustee under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act an amount in excess of $10,000. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William J. Howell, Member, House of Delegates, 00-017 (4/18/00).

§ 64.2-905.
Multiple beneficiaries; separate custodial trusts; survivorship.

Beneficial interests in a custodial trust created for multiple beneficiaries are deemed to be separate custodial trusts of equal undivided interests for each beneficiary. Except in a transfer or declaration for use and benefit of spouses, for whom survivorship is presumed, a right of survivorship does not exist unless the instrument creating the custodial trust specifically provides for survivorship or survivorship is required as to marital property.

Custodial trust property held under this chapter by the same custodial trustee for the use and benefit of the same beneficiary may be administered as a single custodial trust.

A custodial trustee of custodial trust property held for more than one beneficiary shall separately account to each beneficiary pursuant to §§

64.2-906

and

64.2-914

for the administration of the custodial trust.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.6; 2012, c. 614; 2020, c. 900.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900, substituted “spouses” for “husband and wife” in subsection A, last sentence.

§ 64.2-906.
General duties of custodial trustee.

If appropriate, a custodial trustee shall register or record the instrument vesting title to custodial trust property. If the beneficiary is not incapacitated, a custodial trustee shall follow the directions of the beneficiary in the management, control, investment, or retention of the custodial trust property. In the absence of effective contrary direction by the beneficiary while not incapacitated, the custodial trustee shall observe the standard of care set forth in the Uniform Prudent Investor Act (§

64.2-780

et seq.), except to the extent provided by §

64.2-1502

. However, a custodial trustee, in the custodial trustee’s discretion, may retain any custodial trust property received from the transferor. Subject to this subsection, a custodial trustee shall take control of and collect, hold, manage, invest, and reinvest custodial trust property.

A custodial trustee at all times shall keep custodial trust property of which the custodial trustee has control, separate from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly as custodial trust property of the beneficiary. Custodial trust property, the title to which is subject to recordation, is so identified if an appropriate instrument so identifying the property is recorded, and custodial trust property subject to registration is so identified if it is registered, or held in an account in the name of the custodial trustee, designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for . . . . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act.”

A custodial trustee shall keep records of all transactions with respect to custodial trust property, including information necessary for the preparation of tax returns, and shall make the records and information available at reasonable times to the beneficiary or legal representative of the beneficiary.

An agent under a power of attorney for an incapacitated beneficiary may not terminate or direct the administration of a custodial trust.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.7; 2007, c. 517; 2010, cc. 455, 632; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For
article on 2007 and 2008 legislative and judicial developments in the areas of wills, trusts, and estates, see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (2008).

§ 64.2-907.
General powers of custodial trustee.

A custodial trustee, acting in a fiduciary capacity, has all the rights and powers over custodial trust property that an unmarried adult owner has over individually owned property, which shall include but not be limited to those powers set forth in §

64.2-105

as of the date the custodian acts, but a custodial trustee may exercise those rights and powers in a fiduciary capacity only.

This section does not relieve a custodial trustee from liability for a violation of §

64.2-906

.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.8; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-908.
Use of custodial trust property.

A custodial trustee shall pay to the beneficiary or expend for the beneficiary’s use and benefit so much or all of the custodial trust property as the beneficiary while not incapacitated may direct from time to time. If the beneficiary is incapacitated, the custodial trustee shall expend so much or all of the custodial trust property as the custodial trustee considers advisable for the use and benefit of the beneficiary and individuals who were supported by the beneficiary when the beneficiary became incapacitated, or who are legally entitled to support by the beneficiary. Expenditures may be made in the manner, when, and to the extent that the custodial trustee determines suitable and proper, without court order and without regard to other support, income, or property of the beneficiary.

A custodial trustee may establish checking, savings, or other similar accounts of reasonable amounts under which either the custodial trustee or the beneficiary may withdraw funds from, or draw checks against, the accounts. Funds withdrawn from, or checks written against, the account by the beneficiary are distributions of custodial trust property by the custodial trustee to the beneficiary.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.9; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-909.
Determination of incapacity; effect.

The custodial trustee shall administer the custodial trust as for an incapacitated beneficiary if (i) the custodial trust was created under §

64.2-904

, (ii) the transferor has so directed in the instrument creating the custodial trust, or (iii) the custodial trustee has determined that the beneficiary is incapacitated. A custodial trustee may determine that the beneficiary is incapacitated in reliance upon (a) previous direction or authority given by the beneficiary while not incapacitated, including direction or authority pursuant to a durable power of attorney, (b) the certificate of the beneficiary’s physician, or (c) other persuasive evidence. On petition of the beneficiary, the custodial trustee, or other person interested in the custodial trust property or the welfare of the beneficiary, the court shall determine whether the beneficiary is incapacitated. Absent determination of incapacity of the beneficiary, a custodial trustee who has reason to believe that the beneficiary is incapacitated shall administer the custodial trust in accordance with the provisions of this chapter applicable to an incapacitated beneficiary.

If a custodial trustee for an incapacitated beneficiary reasonably concludes that the beneficiary’s incapacity has ceased, or that circumstances concerning the beneficiary’s ability to manage property and business affairs have changed since the creation of a custodial trust directing administration as for an incapacitated beneficiary, the custodial trustee may administer the trust as for a beneficiary who is not incapacitated.

Incapacity of a beneficiary does not terminate (i) the custodial trust, (ii) any designation of a successor custodial trustee, (iii) rights or powers of the custodial trustee, or (iv) any immunities of third persons acting on instructions of the custodial trustee.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.10; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-910.
Exemption of third person from liability.

A third person in good faith and without a court order may act on instructions of, or otherwise deal with, a person purporting to make a transfer as, or purporting to act in the capacity of, a custodial trustee. In the absence of knowledge to the contrary, the third person is not responsible for determining (i) the validity of the purported custodial trustee’s designation, (ii) the propriety of, or the authority under this chapter for, any action of the purported custodial trustee, (iii) the validity or propriety of an instrument executed or instruction given pursuant to this chapter either by the person purporting to make a transfer or declaration or by the purported custodial trustee, or (iv) the propriety of the application of property vested in the purported custodial trustee.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.11; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-911.
Liability to third person; exceptions.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a custodial trustee acting in a fiduciary capacity, an obligation arising from the ownership or control of custodial trust property, or a tort committed in the course of administering the custodial trust, may be asserted by a third person against the custodial trust property by proceeding against the custodial trustee in a fiduciary capacity, whether or not the custodial trustee or the beneficiary is personally liable.

A custodial trustee is not personally liable to a third person (i) on a contract properly entered into in a fiduciary capacity, unless the custodial trustee fails to reveal that capacity or to identify the custodial trust in the contract, or (ii) for an obligation arising from control of custodial trust property or for a tort committed in the course of the administration of the custodial trust unless the custodial trustee is personally at fault. A beneficiary is not personally liable to a third person for an obligation arising from beneficial ownership of custodial trust property or for a tort committed in the course of administration of the custodial trust unless the beneficiary is personally in possession of the custodial trust property giving rise to the liability or is personally at fault.

This section does not preclude actions or proceedings to establish liability of the custodial trustee or beneficiary to the extent the person sued is protected as the insured by liability insurance.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.12; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-912.
Declination, resignation, incapacity, death, or removal of custodial trustee; designation of successor.

Before accepting the custodial trust property, a person designated as custodial trustee may decline to serve by notifying the person who made the designation, the transferor, or the transferor’s legal representative. If an event giving rise to a transfer has not occurred, the substitute custodial trustee designated under §

64.2-902

becomes the custodial trustee, or, if a substitute custodial trustee has not been designated, the person who made the designation may designate a substitute custodial trustee pursuant to §

64.2-902

. In other cases, the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative may designate a substitute custodial trustee.

A custodial trustee who has accepted the custodial trust property may resign by (i) delivering written notice to a successor custodial trustee, if any, the beneficiary, and, if the beneficiary is incapacitated, to the beneficiary’s conservator, if any, and (ii) transferring or registering, or recording an appropriate instrument relating to, the custodial trust property, in the name of, and delivering the records to, the successor custodial trustee.

If a custodial trustee or successor custodial trustee is ineligible, resigns, dies, or becomes incapacitated, the successor designated in accordance with the trust instrument or in accordance with §

64.2-902

becomes custodial trustee. If there is no effective provision for a successor, the beneficiary, if not incapacitated, may designate a successor custodial trustee. If the beneficiary is incapacitated, or fails to act within 90 days after the ineligibility, resignation, death, or incapacity of the custodial trustee, the beneficiary’s conservator becomes successor custodial trustee. If the beneficiary does not have a conservator or the conservator fails to act, the resigning custodial trustee may designate a successor custodial trustee.

If a successor custodial trustee is not designated as provided in this section, the transferor, the legal representative of the transferor or of the custodial trustee, an adult member of the beneficiary’s family, the guardian or conservator of the beneficiary, a person interested in the custodial trust property, or a person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary may petition the court to designate a successor custodial trustee.

A custodial trustee who declines to serve or resigns, or the legal representative of a deceased or incapacitated custodial trustee, as soon as practicable, shall put the custodial trust property and records in the possession and control of the successor custodial trustee. The successor custodial trustee may enforce the obligation to deliver custodial trust property and records and becomes responsible for each item as received.

A beneficiary, the beneficiary’s conservator, an adult member of the beneficiary’s family, a guardian of the beneficiary, a person interested in the custodial trust property, or a person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary may petition the court to remove the custodial trustee for cause and designate a successor custodial trustee, to require the custodial trustee to furnish a bond or other security for the faithful performance of fiduciary duties, or for other appropriate relief.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.13; 1997, c. 80; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-913.
Expenses, compensation, and bond of custodial trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the instrument creating the custodial trust, in an agreement with the beneficiary, or by court order, a custodial trustee:

Is entitled to reimbursement from custodial trust property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of fiduciary services;

Has a noncumulative election, to be made no later than six months after the end of each calendar year, to charge a reasonable compensation for fiduciary services performed during that year; and

Need not furnish a bond or other security for the faithful performance of fiduciary duties.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.14; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-914.
Reporting and accounting by custodial trustee; determination of liability.

Upon the acceptance of custodial trust property, the custodial trustee shall provide a written statement describing the custodial trust property and shall thereafter provide a written statement of the administration of the custodial trust property (i) once each year, (ii) upon request at reasonable times by the beneficiary or the beneficiary’s legal representative, (iii) upon resignation or removal of the custodial trustee, and (iv) upon termination of the custodial trust. The statements shall be provided to the beneficiary or to the beneficiary’s legal representative, if any. Upon termination of the beneficiary’s interest, the custodial trustee shall furnish a current statement to the person to whom the custodial trust property is to be delivered.

A beneficiary, the beneficiary’s legal representative, an adult member of the beneficiary’s family, a person interested in the custodial trust property, or a person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary may petition the court for an accounting by the custodial trustee or the custodial trustee’s legal representative.

A successor custodial trustee may petition the court for an accounting by a predecessor custodial trustee.

If a custodial trustee is removed, the court shall require an accounting and order delivery of the custodial trust property and records to the successor custodial trustee and the execution of all instruments required for transfer of the custodial trust property.

In an action or proceeding under this chapter or in any other proceeding, the court may require or permit the custodial trustee or the custodial trustee’s legal representative to account. The custodial trustee or the custodial trustee’s legal representative may petition the court for approval of final accounts.

On petition of the custodial trustee or any person who could petition for an accounting, the court, after notice to interested persons, may issue instructions to the custodial trustee or review the propriety of the acts of a custodial trustee or the reasonableness of compensation determined by the custodial trustee for the services of the custodial trustee or others.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.15; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-915.
Limitations of action against custodial trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, unless previously barred by adjudication, consent, or limitation, a claim for relief against a custodial trustee for accounting or breach of duty is barred as to a beneficiary, a person to whom custodial trust property is to be paid or delivered, or the legal representative of an incapacitated or deceased beneficiary or payee who (i) has received a final account or statement fully disclosing the matter unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within two years after receipt of the final account or statement or (ii) has not received a final account or statement fully disclosing the matter unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within three years after the termination of the custodial trust.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, a claim for relief to recover from a custodial trustee for fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment related to the final settlement of the custodial trust or concealment of the existence of the custodial trust, is barred unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within five years after the termination of the custodial trust.

A claim for relief is not barred by this section if the claimant:

Is a minor, until the earlier of two years after the claimant becomes an adult or dies;

Is an incapacitated adult, until the earliest of two years after (i) the appointment of a conservator, (ii) the removal of the incapacity, or (iii) the death of the claimant; or

Was an adult, now deceased, who was not incapacitated, until two years after the claimant’s death.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.16; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-916.
Distribution on termination.

Upon termination of a custodial trust, the custodial trustee shall transfer the unexpended custodial trust property as follows:

To the beneficiary, if not incapacitated or deceased;

To the conservator or such other recipient as is designated by the court for an incapacitated beneficiary; or

Upon the beneficiary’s death, in the following order:

As last directed in writing signed by the deceased beneficiary while not incapacitated and received by the custodial trustee during the life of the deceased beneficiary;

To the survivor of multiple beneficiaries if survivorship is provided for pursuant to §

64.2-905

;

As designated in the instrument creating the custodial trust; or

To the estate of the deceased beneficiary.

If, when the custodial trust would otherwise terminate, the distributee is incapacitated, the custodial trust continues for the use and benefit of the distributee as beneficiary until the incapacity is removed or the custodial trust is otherwise terminated.

Death of the beneficiary does not terminate the power of the custodial trustee to discharge obligations of the custodial trustee or beneficiary incurred before the termination of the custodial trust.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.17; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-917.
Methods and forms for creating custodial trusts.

If a transaction, including a declaration with respect to or a transfer of specific property, otherwise satisfies applicable law, the criteria of §

64.2-901

are satisfied by either:

The execution and either delivery to the custodial trustee or recording of an instrument in substantially the following form:

Click to view

TRANSFER UNDER THE VIRGINIA UNIFORM CUSTODIAL TRUST ACT I, (name of transferor or name and representative capacity if a fiduciary), transfer to (name of trustee other than transferor), as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) as beneficiary and (name of distributee) as distributee on termination of the trust in absence of direction by the beneficiary under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act, the following: (insert a description of the custodial trust property legally sufficient to identify and transfer each item of property). Dated: (signature of transferor or fiduciary) 2. The execution and the recording or giving notice of its execution to the beneficiary of an instrument in substantially the following form: DECLARATION OF TRUST UNDER THE VIRGINIA UNIFORM CUSTODIAL TRUST ACT I, (name of owner of property), declare that henceforth I hold as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary other than transferor) as beneficiary and (name of distributee) as distributee on termination of the trust in absence of direction by the beneficiary under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act, the following: (insert a description of the custodial trust property legally sufficient to identify and transfer each item of property). Dated: (signature of owner) 3. Either form may be modified by the owner to include, for example, a designation of an alternate or successor trustee or the recipient of the custodial property upon termination of the trust. B. Customary methods of transferring or evidencing ownership of property may be used to create a custodial trust, including any of the following: 1. Registration of a security in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; 2. Delivery of a certificated security, or a document necessary for the transfer of an uncertificated security, together with any necessary endorsement, to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company as custodial trustee, accompanied by an instrument in substantially the form prescribed in subdivision A 1; 3. Payment of money or transfer of a security held in the name of a broker or a financial institution or its nominee to a broker or financial institution for credit to an account in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; 4. Registration of ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract with the issuer in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; 5. Delivery of a written assignment to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company whose name in the assignment is designated in substance by the words “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; 6. Irrevocable exercise of power of appointment, pursuant to its terms, in favor of a trust company, an adult other than the donee of the power, or the donee who holds the power if the beneficiary is other than the donee, whose name in the appointment is designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; 7. Delivery of a written notification or assignment of a right to future payment under a contract to an obligor that transfers the right under the contract to a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, whose name in the notification or assignment is designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; 8. Execution, delivery, and recordation of a conveyance of an interest in real property in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; 9. Issuance of a certificate of title by an agency of a state or of the United States that evidences title to tangible personal property (i) issued in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act,” or (ii) delivered to a trust company or an adult other than the transferor or endorsed by the transferor to that person, designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act”; or 10. Execution and delivery of an instrument of gift to a trust company or an adult other than the transferor, designated in substance “as custodial trustee for (name of beneficiary) under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act.”

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.18; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-317 Transfer Under the Virginia Uniform Custodial Trust Act, et seq.

§ 64.2-918.
Applicable law.

This chapter applies to a transfer or declaration creating a custodial trust that refers to this chapter if, at the time of the transfer or declaration, the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee is a resident of or has its principal place of business in the Commonwealth or custodial trust property is located in the Commonwealth. The custodial trust remains subject to this chapter despite a later change in residence or principal place of business of the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee, or removal of the custodial trust property from the Commonwealth.

A transfer made pursuant to an act of another state substantially similar to this chapter is governed by the law of that state and may be enforced in the Commonwealth.

History.

1990, c. 264, § 55-34.19; 2012, c. 614.